North Dakota statutes. TITLE 61 Waters
CHAPTER 61-04 Appropriation of Water
61-04-23.
Cancellation of water rights — Inspection of works.

Any appropriation of water must be for a beneficial use, and when the appropriator fails to apply it to the beneficial use cited in the permit or ceases to use it for the beneficial use cited in the permit for three successive years, unless the failure or cessation of use has been due to the unavailability of water, a justifiable inability to complete the works, or other good and sufficient cause, the department of water resources may cancel the water permit or right. For purposes of this chapter, an incorporated municipality or rural water system has good and sufficient cause excusing the failure to use a water permit, if the water permit reasonably may be necessary for the future water requirements of the municipality or the rural water system. The department of water resources, as often as necessary, shall examine the condition of all works constructed or partially constructed within the state and compile information concerning the condition of every water permit or right and all ditches and other works constructed or partially constructed under the permit or right.

Source:

S.L. 1963, ch. 419, § 3; 1965, ch. 447, § 11; 1969, ch. 544, § 1; 1977, ch. 569, § 21; 1985, ch. 670, § 2; 1993, ch. 597, § 1; 1997, ch. 517, § 3; 2019, ch. 508, § 26, effective July 1, 2019; 2021, ch. 488, § 96, effective August 1, 2021.

61-04-24.
Cancellation of water rights — Notice — Contents.

If it appears any water appropriation or portion of an appropriation has not been used for a beneficial use, or having been so used at one time has ceased to be used for that purpose for more than three successive years, unless the failure or cessation of use is due to the unavailability of water, a justifiable inability to complete the works, or other good and sufficient cause, the department of water resources shall set a place and time for a hearing. For purposes of this chapter, an incorporated municipality or a rural water system has good and sufficient cause excusing the failure to use a water permit, if the water permit reasonably may be necessary for the future water requirements of the municipality or the rural water system. Any permitholder using water from a common source of supply, any applicant for a permit to use water from a common source of supply, or any interested party may request the department of water resources to conduct a hearing to cancel any unused water rights to the common source of supply. Any decision of the department in denying a request for a hearing may be appealed in accordance with chapter 28-32. Prior to the hearings, the department shall serve notice upon the permitholder and upon the owners of land benefited by the appropriation or works, except where the lands benefited are within the geographical boundaries of a city, in which case notice must be given to the governing body of the city, to show cause by a time and at a place why the water appropriation or a portion of the appropriation should not be canceled.

In addition to the time and place of hearing, the notice must contain:

A description of the water appropriation.

The permit number upon the records of the commission.

The date of priority.

The point of diversion.

A description of the lands benefited by the appropriation as indicated on the water permit on file with the commission.

Notice that the permitholder, the owners of land benefited by the appropriation or works, and other interested parties whose right to use water may be affected by a cancellation of the appropriation are to show cause why the appropriation, or a portion of the appropriation, should not be canceled.

The notice must be served personally or sent by certified mail at least thirty days before the date of hearing to the permitholder and to the owners of land benefited by the appropriation as indicated on the water permit on file with the commission, or to persons having an interest in works as they appear from the records of the county treasurer or the recorder. In addition, the notice must be published in the official newspaper in the county in which the point of diversion is located once each week for two consecutive weeks prior to the date of hearing.

Source:

S.L. 1963, ch. 419, § 4; 1977, ch. 569, § 22; 1985, ch. 670, § 3; 1985, ch. 671, § 1; 1997, ch. 517, § 4; 2001, ch. 120, § 1; 2019, ch. 508, § 27, effective July 1, 2019; 2021, ch. 488, § 97, effective August 1, 2021.

61-04-25.
Cancellation of water rights — Hearing — Appeal.

At the hearing the recommended decision of the department of water resources is prima facie evidence for cancellation of the water permit or portion of the permit. If no one appears at the hearing, the water permit or portion must be canceled. If interested parties appear and contest the cancellation, the department shall hear the evidence and, if it appears the water has not been put to a beneficial use, or, having been put to a beneficial use at one time, has ceased to be used for the purpose for more than three successive years, unless the failure or cessation of use is due to the unavailability of water, a justifiable inability to complete the works, or other good and sufficient cause, the permit, or a portion of the permit, must be canceled. For purposes of this chapter, an incorporated municipality or a rural water system has good and sufficient cause excusing the failure to use a water permit, if the water permit reasonably may be necessary for the future water requirements of the municipality or the rural water system. An appeal may be taken from the decision of the department in accordance with chapter 28-32.

Source:

S.L. 1963, ch. 419, § 5; 1965, ch. 447, § 12; 1985, ch. 670, § 4; 1997, ch. 517, § 5; 2019, ch. 508, § 28, effective July 1, 2019; 2021, ch. 488, § 98, effective August 1, 2021.

61-04-26.
Recorder to record water permit or order affecting water right.

A water permit may be recorded as any other instrument affecting the title to real property without acknowledgment or further proof. The order canceling a water right or portion of a water right must be filed by the department of water resources with the county recorder where the affected land is located and recorded as any other instrument affecting the title to real property without acknowledgment or further proof. Any document filed under this section must be listed in the index of the property affected as provided in section 11-18-07.

Source:

S.L. 1963, ch. 419, § 6; 1977, ch. 569, § 23; 2001, ch. 120, § 1; 2019, ch. 508, § 29, effective July 1, 2019; 2021, ch. 488, § 99, effective August 1, 2021.

61-04-27.
Information filed with department of water resources — Installation of measuring devices.

By March thirty-first of each year, permitholders shall file with the department of water resources, on forms supplied by the department, water use and other information as the department requires. The department also may require permitholders to install measuring devices conforming to the department’s specifications, at all points specified by the department.

Source:

S.L. 1963, ch. 417, § 20; 1989, ch. 748, § 4; 2013, ch. 480, § 2; 2019, ch. 508, § 30, effective July 1, 2019; 2021, ch. 488, § 100, effective August 1, 2021.

61-04-28.
Correction of application or water right by department of water resources.

Upon proof satisfactory to the department of water resources that a water permit application or water permit contains a nonmaterial error, the department, by written notice to the holder of the affected water permit or application, may correct the error without publication of notice.

Source:

S.L. 1965, ch. 447, § 13; 1991, ch. 701, § 1; 2019, ch. 508, § 31, effective July 1, 2019; 2021, ch. 488, § 101, effective August 1, 2021.

61-04-29.
Enforcement.

The department of water resources has full power and authority to institute, maintain, and prosecute to determination in an administrative proceeding or any of the courts of this state, or in any of the federal courts, any and all actions, suits, and special proceedings that may be necessary to enjoin unauthorized use of water, enforce an order of the department or the commission, or otherwise administer the provisions of this chapter. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the department of water resources may issue administrative orders requiring the immediate cessation of water use when the department has a reasonable belief the use is unauthorized or continued use will damage the rights of prior appropriators.

Source:

S.L. 1977, ch. 569, § 24; 1989, ch. 748, § 5; 2019, ch. 508, § 32, effective July 1, 2019; 2021, ch. 488, § 102, effective August 1, 2021.

61-04-30.
Penalty.

A person who constructs works for an appropriation, or diverts, impounds, withdraws, or uses a significant amount of water from any source without a permit specifically authorizing such action, except as otherwise provided in section 61-04-02; who violates an order of the department of water resources; who fails or refuses to install meters, gauges, or other measuring devices or to control works; who violates an order establishing corrective controls for an area or for a source of water; who violates the terms of the permit; or who knowingly makes a false or misleading statement in a declaration of existing rights is guilty of a class A misdemeanor. As used in this section, “significant amount of water” means any amount of water in excess of that allowed in a valid water permit, or any amount of water in excess of the needs for domestic and livestock purposes where no permit has been issued. The department of water resources shall inform the tax commissioner of violations of industrial use permits.

Source:

S.L. 1977, ch. 569, § 25; 1989, ch. 748, § 6; 2013, ch. 480, § 3; 2015, ch. 472, §
4, effective August 1, 2015; 2021, ch. 488, § 103, effective August 1, 2021.

Cross-References.

Criminal penalty for violating rule or regulation of state engineer, see N.D.C.C. § 61-01-25.

Penalties for classified offenses, see N.D.C.C. § 12.1-32-01.

61-04-31.
Reservation of waters — Public hearing — Notice.

Whenever it appears necessary to the department of water resources, or when directed by the commission, the department may reserve and set aside waters by regulation for beneficial use in the future.

Before the adoption of a regulation under this section, the department shall conduct a public hearing in each county where waters relating to the regulation are located. At least seven days before the date set for the public hearing, a notice must be published in the official county newspapers within each of the counties.

Regulations adopted hereunder are subject to chapter 28-32.

When sufficient information or data is lacking to allow for sound decisionmaking on a water permit application, the department of water resources may withdraw various waters of the state from additional appropriations until sufficient data or information is available. Water permit applications pending from these sources will be placed in a deferred status.

Source:

S.L. 1977, ch. 569, § 26; 2015, ch. 472, § 4, effective August 1, 2015; 2021, ch. 488, § 104, effective August 1, 2021.

Cross-References.

Criminal penalty for violation of rule or regulation of state engineer, see N.D.C.C. § 61-01-25.

61-04-32.
Damages for illegal diminishment of water supply.

If a court of competent jurisdiction determines that a water supply has been illegally diminished in quantity or quality and that a valid water right to use that supply has been damaged as a result of the diminishment, damages awarded to the owner of the water right shall be an amount to cover the cost of making such repairs, alterations, or construction that will ensure the delivery to the surface owner of that quality and quantity of water available to the surface owner prior to the diminishment.

Source:

S.L. 1987, ch. 434, § 2.